District of Columbia statutes.
7-2031

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Care giver” means an individual whose duties include direct care, supervision, and guidance of infants or children in a child development facility.

(2)

“Child” or “children” means an individual or individuals from 2 years to 15 years of age.

(3)

“Child development facility” means a center, home, or other structure that provides care and other services, supervision, and guidance for children, infants, and toddlers on a regular basis, regardless of its designated name. “Child development facility” does not include a public or private elementary or secondary school engaged in legally required educational and related functions or a pre-kindergarten education program licensed pursuant to the Pre-k Act of 2008.

(4)

“Infant” means an individual younger than 12 months of age.

(5)

“Licensee” means a child development facility that is licensed pursuant to this subchapter.

(6)

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, company, corporation, trustee, or association.

(6A)

“Pre-k Act of 2008” means Chapter 2A of Title 38 [§ 38-271.01 et seq.].

(7)

“Related person” means any legal guardian or any of the following relationships established by marriage, adoption, or blood to the 5th degree:

(A)

Parent or step-parent;

(B)

Grandparent;

(C)

Brother, sister, step-sister, or step-brother;

(D)

Uncle or aunt; or

(E)

Niece or nephew.

(8)

“Toddler” means an individual older than 12 months but less than 24 months of age.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 2, 46 DCR 274
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 603(a), 55 DCR 6297

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-231.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3621.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-202, in par. (3), substituted “related functions or a pre- kindergarten education program licensed pursuant to the Pre-k Act of 2008” for “related functions”; and added par. (6A).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of §§ 7-2031 to 7-2050, see §§ 2 to 21 of Child Development Facilities Regulation Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-71, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2106).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary regulation of child development facilities, see §§ 2-21 of the Child Development Facilities Regulation Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-206, December 15, 1997, 44 DCR 346).
For temporary addition of subchapter II, see §§ 2-21 of the Child Development Facilities Regulation Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-511, November 10, 1998, 45 DCR 8153), and §§ 2-21 of the Child Development Facilities Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-11, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2322).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Act 13-11, the “Child Development Facilities Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999”, see Mayor’s Order 99-66, April 28, 1999 ( 46 DCR 4231).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 12-215, the “Child Development Facilities Regulation Act of 1998”, see Mayor’s Order 2000-124, August 3, 2000 ( 47 DCR 6808).